Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-3407
Property tax request authority; unused property tax request authority; requirements; school district; failure to comply; withhold state aid.

The department shall prepare documents to be submitted by school districts to aid the department in calculating each school district's property tax request authority and unused property tax request authority. Each school district shall submit such documents to the department on or before October 15 of each year. If a school district fails to submit such documents to the department or if the department determines from such documents that a school district is not complying with the limits provided in the School District Property Tax Limitation Act, the department shall notify the school district of its determination. The Commissioner of Education shall then direct that any state aid granted pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act be withheld until such time as the school district submits the required documents or complies with the School District Property Tax Limitation Act. The state aid shall be held for six months. If the school district complies within the six-month period, it shall receive the suspended state aid. If the school district fails to comply within the six-month period, the suspended state aid shall revert to the General Fund.

Laws 2023, LB243, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB937, § 16.
July 18, 2026
Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.